District of Columbia statutes.
44-714

Conflicts of interest by directors or trustees of certain charitable institutions.

No member or members of any board or boards of trustees or directors of any charitable institution, organization or corporation in the District of Columbia, which is supported in whole or in part by appropriations made by Congress, shall engage in traffic with said institution, organization or corporation for financial gain, and any member or members of such board of trustees or directors who shall so engage in such traffic shall be deemed legally disqualified for service on said board or boards.

History

June 11, 1896, 29 Stat. 410, ch. 419, § 1

Cross References

Public welfare supervision, board of public welfare, institutions supported by congressional appropriations, see § 4-111.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1206.
1973 Ed., § 32-1007.